Wisconsin, session 2025, AB301.
do enact as follows:AB301,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB301,27Section 2. 20.435 (5) (bk) of the statutes is created to read:AB301,2,10820.435 (5) (bk) Mental health clubhouse grants. The amounts in the schedule 9for grants to mental health clubhouses under s. 46.67. No moneys may be 10encumbered under this paragraph after June 30, 2030.AB301,311Section 3. 46.67 of the statutes is created to read:AB301,2,151246.67 Mental health clubhouse grants. (1) In this subsection, 13“clubhouse” means a nonresidential rehabilitation program that provides support 14and services to individuals who have or are awaiting diagnosis for a mental illness 15but does not directly provide treatment or medical care for mental illnesses.AB301,2,1916(2) The department shall award grants to clubhouses in a total amount of no 17more than $300,000 per fiscal year and no more than $50,000 per clubhouse per 18fiscal year. The department may not award a grant to a clubhouse unless the 19clubhouse meets all of the following criteria:AB301,2,2220(a) Every member who receives services at the clubhouse has been diagnosed 21with or is awaiting diagnosis for a mental illness and is under treatment for that 22condition.AB301,3,223(b) The clubhouse raises an amount of money to match the grant amount 1requested. The department may not award a grant to a clubhouse that exceeds the 2money raised by the clubhouse.AB301,3,33(c) Membership in clubhouse activities and services is voluntary.AB301,3,54(d) The clubhouse has its own distinct physical space separate from a mental 5health center or institution.AB301,3,76(e) Members of the clubhouse have the opportunity to participate in the 7administration and other operational functions of the clubhouse.AB301,3,88(3) No grant may be awarded under this section after June 30, 2030.AB301,49Section 4. Effective date.AB301,3,1110(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 11publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB301,3,1212